Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.038

Study of state building code relating to energy.

The senate and house committees on energy and utilities shall make continuing studies of the state building code as it relates to energy consumption, conservation and retention and shall submit their recommendations concerning such to the legislature periodically.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 14 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 14: See RCW 19.27.905.

Energy-related building standards: Chapter 19.27A RCW.